Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 3. Amendment and Restatement of Articles.

Sec. 10.15.365.
Amendment of articles.

A cooperative may amend its articles from time to time as may be desired, so long as its articles as amended contain only those provisions which might be lawfully contained in the original articles at the time of making the amendment, and, if a change in shares or the rights of shareholders or members, or an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of shares or the rights of shareholders or members is to be made, those provisions necessary to effect the change, exchange, reclassification, or cancellation.

History.

(§ 41(1) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.370.
Procedure for adopting amendments.

An amendment to the articles shall be made in the manner set out in this section.

The board shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and directing it to be submitted to a vote at an annual or special meeting of the members of the cooperative.

Written notice setting out the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected by the amendment shall be given to each member of record within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. If the meeting is an annual meeting, the proposed amendment or the summary may be included in the notice of the annual meeting.

At the meeting the members shall vote on the proposed amendment. The proposed amendment is adopted if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the member votes cast. If shareholders are entitled by this chapter to vote on the proposed amendment, the proposed amendment is adopted if it receives the approval of shareholders as specified in this chapter, as well as the affirmative vote of a majority of member votes cast. Any number of amendments may be submitted to the members and voted upon by them at one meeting.

History.

(§ 41(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory clause was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (3) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (d) respectively.

Sec. 10.15.375.
Shareholder and member voting on amendments to articles.

If a proposed amendment to articles would affect a shareholder, the shareholder, whether or not permitted to vote by the articles, may cast one vote on the amendment regardless of the dollar amount of stock or number of affected classes of stock held by the shareholder. However, the articles may permit the affected shareholder to cast one vote for each share of stock the shareholder holds other than membership stock. A member holding stock affected by a proposed amendment may vote both as a member and as an affected shareholder.

If a shareholder is entitled to vote on a proposed amendment, the meeting at which the proposed amendment is to be voted upon shall be a joint meeting of members and affected shareholders. Notice of the meeting together with a copy of the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected by the amendment shall be given to each shareholder of record entitled to vote on the amendment within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. The proposed amendment is adopted if it receives the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes of the affected shareholders entitled to vote.

For the purpose of this section, a shareholder is affected as to a class of stock owned by the shareholder if an amendment would expressly

decrease the dividends to which the class is entitled or change the method by which the dividend rate on the class is fixed;

restrict rights to transfer the class;

give to another existing or new class of stock or equity interest not previously entitled to it preference as to dividends or upon dissolution which is the same or higher than preferences of that class;

change the par value of shares of the class or of any other class having the same or higher preferences as to dividends or upon dissolution;

increase the number of authorized shares of a class having higher preferences as to dividends or upon dissolution;

require or permit an exchange of shares of a class with lower preferences as to dividends or upon dissolution for shares of that class or any other class with the same or higher preferences.

History.

(§ 42 ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.380.
Execution and content of articles of amendment.

Following adoption of an amendment to the articles, it shall be executed in duplicate by the cooperative by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and must set out

the name of the cooperative;

if an amendment changes a provision of the original or amended articles, an identification by reference or description of the affected provision and a statement of its text as it is amended to read, or, if an amendment strikes or deletes a provision of the original or amended articles, an identification by reference or description of the provision stricken or deleted and a statement that it is stricken or deleted, and, if the amendment is an addition to the original or amended articles, a statement of that fact and the full text of the provision added;

the date of the adoption of the amendment by the members;

the numbers of members voting for and against the amendment;

if affected shareholders had the right to vote, the number of affected shareholders, the number of shareholder votes entitled to be voted on the amendment, and the number of shareholder votes cast for and against the amendment.

History.

(§ 43(1) ch 107 SLA 1959; am § 22 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.15.385.
Filing of articles of amendment.

Duplicate originals of the articles of amendment shall be filed, and a certificate of amendment shall be issued and delivered to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 43(2) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.390.
Effect of amendments.

An amendment does not affect an existing cause of action in favor of or against the cooperative, or a pending suit to which the cooperative is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than members or affected shareholders.
If the cooperative’s name is changed by amendment, a suit brought by or against the cooperative under its former name does not abate for that reason.

History.

(§ 43(3) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Sec. 10.15.395.
Governing law.

The provisions of AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code) relating to restated articles of business corporations apply to cooperatives, except that the restated articles need not set forth the amount of stated capital.

History.

(§ 43(4) ch 107 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1988 “AS 10.06 (Alaska Corporations Code)” was substituted for “Alaska Business Corporation Act (AS 10.05)” to conform to the enactment of AS 10.06 and the repeal of AS 10.05 by ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For provisions on restated articles, see AS

10.06.516

—

10.06.520

.